apertium-chv.chv.twol
с: [ т: | д: ]*  _ %{RUS%}:* %{w%}:* %>: ;				! власть > влаҫ, ересь > ереҫ in all composites
               _ е: %{RUS%}: ;    					! to avoid conflict with ье (and ь:й) in Russian loans
!         Cns: _ %{RUS%}: %>: ;						! to avoid conflict with Final ь in Russian loans
               _ е:0 :0* %>: [ :и | :ӗ | :ӳ ]/[ %>: | :0 ] ;		! кӗсье<n><px2sg><nom> = кӗсйӳ, кӗсье<n><px2pl><nom> = кӗсйӗр, кӗсье<n><px3sp> = кесйи
!               _ %{Ӗ%}:0 :0* %>: [ :ӗ | :ӳ ]/[ %>: | :0 ] ;		! платьӖ}%{w%}%>%{н%}%{А%}: платйӗне
!               _ %{Ӗ%}:0 :0* %>: [ :и ]/[ %>: | :0 ] ;			! плать{Ӗ}>%{dup%}%{в%}%{ӗ%}%{н%}: платйи
!   COMBINED below:
               _ %{Ӗ%}:0 :0* %>: [ :ӗ | :ӳ | :и ]/[ %>: | :0 ] ;

!!!!! Gemination rules !!!!!

!JNW TEMP
!"{dup} > previous cons before vowel-initial suffix"
!%{dup%}:C1 <=> C2 _ %>: %{Ӑ%}: %{н%}: ;
!               C2 _ [ :Glasnye ]/[ %>: | :0 ] ;
!               C2 _ %{Ӑ%}:0 ;							! сӑвӑ<px1pl><nom> = сӑввӑмӑр
!!              C2 _ %{Ӑdel%}:0 ;						! сӑвӑ<px2pl><nom> = сӑввӑр
!               :Glasnye C2 %>: _ %{и%}: ;					! аван>ни (substantivisation)
!        except
!!  FIXME: do the following rules do something different?
!               :Glasnye C2 %{nodup%}:* [ ӑ: | ӗ: ] %>: _ ;
!               :Glasnye C2 %{nodup%}: [ ӑ: | ӗ: ] %>: _ %{в%}: %{ӗ%}: ;		! %{nodup%} blocks duplication in px3sp
!        where  C2 in Soglasnye
!               C1 in Soglasnye
!               matched ;

"{ː} > previous consonant before vowel-initial suffix"
%{ː%}:C1 <=> C2 _ ( AEVow: ) %>: [ %{ӑ%}: | %{Ӑ%}: | ӗ: | %{У%}: | %{А%}: | %{Ӗ%}: ]/[ :0 ] ;
         where C2 in Soglasnye
               C1 in Soglasnye
               matched ;

"{ːno3} > previous consonant before vowel-initial suffix except px3sp"
%{ːno3%}:C1 <=> C2 _ ( AEVow: ) [ %{Ӑ%}: | %{ӑ%}: | ӗ: | %{У%}: | %{А%}: | %{Ӗ%} ]/[ :0 ] ;
            except
                  _ ( AEVow: ) %>: %{Ӗ%}: %{н%}: ;
            where C2 in Soglasnye
                  C1 in Soglasnye
                  matched ;

!JNW TEMP
!"{dup} > т is in пуртӑ"
!%{dup%}:т <=>  .#. п у р т ӑ: %>: _ ;
!! пуртӑ is an exception

!JNW TEMP
!"3px suffix is и immediately after {dup} is realised"
!%{Ӑ%}:и <=> [ %{dup%}:Cns ] %>:0 _ %{н%}: ;
!    [ %{dup%}:Cns ] %{Ӑ%}:0 %>:0 _ %{н%}: ;

!"{Ӑ} deletes immediately after {dup} when {dup} is realised"
!%{Ӑ%}:0 <=> %{dup%}: _ %>: [ %{Ӑ%}: | %{н%}: | %{У%}: ] ;
!            %{dup%}: _ [ %>: | :0 ]* :Soglasnye ;
!         [ %{dup%}: - %{dup%}:0 ] _ ;
!            except
!    [ %{dup%}: - %{dup%}:0 ]/[ %>: ] _ %{н%}: ;

!JNW TEMP
!"{Ӑ} deletes before a vowel-initial case suffix, triggering {dup} to duplicate"
!%{Ӑ%}:0 <=> %{dup%}: _ %>: [ %{Ӑ%}: | %{н%}: | %{У%}: ] ;
!!                    _ %>: :0 %{ӗ%} ;			! кил>%>н%{Ӑ%}>%{dup%}%{в%}%{ӗ%}%{н%} (кил%<ger3%>%<subst%>%<px3sp%>): килни	VERIFY forms
!!                    _ %>: :0 %{У%} ;			! кил>%>н%{Ӑ%}>%{dup%}%{У%}%{н2%} (кил%<ger3%>%<subst%>%<px2sg%>): килнӳ	VERIFY forms
!           except
!    [ %{dup%}: - %{dup%}:0 ]/[ %>: ] _ %{н%}: ;

!JNW TEMP
!"{w} > previous cons in genitive and dative for stems ending in ӑ/ӗ (1)"
!%{w%}:C1 <=> Glasnye C2 [ ӑ: | ӗ: ] _ ;
!! FIXME: You can't have sets in the following:
!        where  C2 in Soglasnye
!               C1 in Soglasnye
!               matched ;
!! пулӑ<n><gen> = пуллӑн, пулӑ<n><dat> = пулла

!JNW TEMP
!"{w} > previous cons in genitive and dative for stems ending in ӑ/ӗ (пурта)"
!%{w%}:т <=> .#. п у р т ӑ: _ ;
!! пуртӑ is an exception
!! пуртӑ<n><gen> = пурттӑн, пуртӑ<n><dat> = пуртта


!!JNW TEMP
!"Delete ӗ/ӑ in stem before genitive and dative ӗ/ӑ when consonant gemination"
!Vx:0 <=> :Glasnye :Soglasnye _ %{w%}: ;
!	         .#. п у р т _ %{w%}: ;
!	except 
!         _ [ %{Ӑdel%}: | %{ӗdel%}: | %{иdel%}: ]/[ :0 - [ %{Ӑdel%}: | %{ӗdel%}: | %{иdel%}: ] ];
!!   the following contexts were COMBINED above
!!          _ %{Ӑdel%}:/[ :0 ] ;
!!          _ %{ӗdel%}:/[ :0 ] ;
!!          _ %{иdel%}:/[ :0 ] ;
!         where Vx in ( ӗ ӑ ) ;
!! пуртӑ is an exception

!JNW TEMP
!"Delete ӗ/ӑ in stem before {del}"
!Vx:0 <=> _ %{del%}: %>: ;
!         where Vx in ( ӗ ӑ ) ;

"Delete ӑ/ӗ in stem after gemination"
Vx:0 <=> %{ː%}:Soglasnye _ ;
     except
!         _ %{Ӗ%}:и/[ :0 - %{Ӑ%}:0 ] ; ! avoid conflict with rule where it'll delete anyway
         _ %{Ӗ%}:и/[ :0 ] ; ! avoid conflict with rule where it'll delete anyway
         _ %{RUS%}:* %>: [ [ %{А%}: | ӗ: | %{Ӑ%}: | %{У%}: | %{И%}: ] - :0 ] ; ! avoid conflict where they'll delete anyway
         _ %{Ӑ%}:/[ %>: | :0 ] ; ! avoid conflict with deletion before {Ӑ}
         _ %{RUS%}:0 .#. ;  ! avoid conflict with deletion in Russian words
			_ .#. ; ! except at the end of a word!
     where Vx in ( ӗ ӑ ) ;

!!!!! Random Consonant Rules !!!!!

"Consonant duplication (dup2)"
%{dup2%}:C1 <=> :Glasnye [ %>: | :0 ]* _ C2 [ %>: | :0 ]* :Glasnye ;
	where C2 in Cns
	      C1 in Cns
	matched ;
! ыранччен, пӗрремӗшччен

"Consonant duplication (dup3)"
%{dup3%}:C1 <=> [ :Glasnye | Sonornye | [ [ л | н ] ь ] ] [ %>: | :0 ]* _ C2 [ %>: | :0 ]* :Glasnye ;
! the following contexts were COMBINED above
!                           :Glasnye [ %>: | :0 ]* _ C2 [ %>: | :0 ]* :Glasnye ;
!                           Sonornye [ %>: | :0 ]* _ C2 [ %>: | :0 ]* :Glasnye ;
!                       [ л | н ]  ь [ %>: | :0 ]* _ C2 [ %>: | :0 ]* :Glasnye ;
! FIXME: sets can't be used like this:
	where C2 in Cns
	      C1 in Cns
	matched ;
! ыранччен, чылайччен 
! пӗрремӗшччен (existing in the chuvash.org corpus) is a spelling mistake and illogical

"т > ч in px3sp"
Ct:ч <=> _ %{RUS%}:* %>: %{dup%}: %{в%}: %{Ӗ%}: ;
	except
         _ %{RUS%}:* %>: %{dup%}: %{в%}: %{Ӗ%}:0 ;	! университет<n><px3sp><dat> = университет>{dup}{в}{ӗ}{н}{w}>{н}{А} = университетне
         _ %{RUS%}:* %>: %{dup%}: %{в%}: %{Ӗ%}: %{н%}: %>: %{Р%}: %{А%}: ;	! университет<n><px3sp><loc> = университет>{dup}{в}{ӗ}{н}>{Р}{А} = университетӗнче
         									! университет<n><px3sp><abl> = университет>{dup}{в}{ӗ}{н}>{Р}{А}н = университетӗнчен
	where Ct in ( т д ) ;

"сть > ҫ in all composites (1): власть > влаҫӗ"
Cd:ҫ <=> с: _ ь: %{RUS%}:* %{w%}:* %>: ;
	where Cd in ( т д ) ;

"сть > ҫ in all composites (2): власть > влаҫӗ"
с:0 <=> _ [ т: | д: ] ь: %{RUS%}:* %{w%}:* %>: ;

"сь > ҫ in all composites: ересь > ереҫ"
с:ҫ <=> _ ь: %{RUS%}:* %{w%}:* %>: ;

"с(т)ь > ҫ in all composites: власть > влаҫӗ, ересь > ереҫ"
ь:0 <=> с: [ т: | д: ]* _ %{RUS%}:* %{w%}:* %>: ;


"ть > ч in px3sp (1): тетрадь > тетраче"
Cd:ч <=> _ ь: %{RUS%}:* %>: %{dup%}: %{в%}: %{Ӗ%}: ;
	except
		   с: _ ь: %{RUS%}:* >: ;			! власть > влаҫ in all composites
	where Cd in ( т д ) ;

"ть > ч in px3sp (2): тетрадь > тетраче"
ь:0 <=> [ т: | д: ] _ %{RUS%}:* %>: %{dup%}: %{в%}: %{Ӗ%} ;
	except
	   с: [ т: | д: ]* _ %{RUS%}:* >: ;			! власть > влаҫ, ересь > ереҫ in all composites

!JNW TEMP
!"чӗлхе%>%{dup%}%{ӗ%} > чӗлхи (1)"
!AE:0 <=> _ %{RUS%}:* %>: %{dup%}: %{в%}: %{ӗ%}: ;
!	where AE in ( ӑ а е ӗ о ) ;

!JNW TEMP
!"чӗлхе%>%{dup%}%{ӗ%} > чӗлхи (2)"
!%{ӗ%}:и <=> AEVow: %{RUS%}:* %>: %{dup%}: %{в%}: _ ;
!                о: %{RUS%}:* %>: %{dup%}: %{в%}: _ ;	! правительстви

"%{Ӗ%} > и ~after unstressed vowels (for px3)"
%{Ӗ%}:и <=> [ AEVow: | о: ]/[ :0 ] _ ;       ! need better context for о
            [ %{ː%}: | %{ːnodup%} ] %>: _ ;  ! йӗп{ː}>{ӗ}{н}:йӗппи
                                             ! (ут{ːno3}ӑ>{ӗ}{н}:ути)

"Delete ӑ/ӗ before ӗ:и (for px3)"
AE:0 <=> _ %{Ӗ%}:и/[ :0 - [ %{А%}:0 | ӗ: ] ] ;
         except
         _ в:0 ;     ! avoid conflict with ӑв/ӗв→у/ӳ
         where AE in ( ӑ а е ӗ о ) ;

"{в} surfaces as в"
%{в%}:в <=>    %{о%}: %>: %{dup%}: _ ӗ: ;		! радиовӗ, киновӗ, киловӗ, быровӗ, деловӗ
          у: %{RUS%}: %>: %{dup%}: _ ӗ: ;		! Бакувӗ
                 ю:й %>: %{dup%}:ӑ _ ӗ: %{н%}: ; ! хӑю>{dup}{в}{ӗ}{н}:хӑйӑвӗ
!!!"ради%{о%}%>%{dup%}%{ӗ%} > радиовӗ"

"{в} > epenthetic й in px3sp for stems ending in и (except dative)"
%{в%}:й <=> [ и: | %{и2%}: ] %{й%}:0* %{RUS%}:* %>: %{dup%}: _ ӗ: ;	! шӑши·йӗ, информаци·йӗ, Золотницки·йӗ
	except                                               _ ӗ: %{н%}: %{w%}: %>: %{н%}: %{А%}: ;	! except dative
!%<px3sp%>:%>%{dup%}%{в%}%{ӗ%}%{н%} POS-INFL ;
!%<dat%>:%{w%}%>%{н%}%{А%} COP ;

"{dup} > epenthetic й in px1sg, px2sg, px1pl, px2pl for stems ending in и"
%{dup%}:й <=> [ и: | %{и2%}: ] %{й%}:0* %{RUS%}:* %>: _ [ %{Ӑ%}: | %{ӑ%}: ] ;	! шӑши<n><px1sg><nom> = шӑши·йӗм, шӑши<n><px1pl><nom> = шӑши·йӗмӗр
									! информаци·йӗм, информаци·йӗмӗр, Золотницки·йӗм, Золотницки·йӗмӗр
!              [ и: | %{и2%}: ] %{й%}:0* %{RUS%}:* %>: _ %{Ӑdel%}: ;	! шӑши<n><px2pl><nom> = шӑши·йӗр, информаци·йӗр, Золотницки·йӗр
!              [ и: | %{и2%}: ] %{й%}:0* %{RUS%}:* %>: _ %{У%}: ;	! шӑши<n><px2sg><nom> = шӑши·йӳ, информаци·йӳ.Золотницки·йӳ
!  the above contexts COMBINED below:
              [ и: | %{и2%}: ] %{й%}:0* %{RUS%}:* %>: _ [ %{У%}: | %{Ӑdel%}: ] ;


!JNW TEMP
!"-ӑ, -ӗ > 0 in px1sg, px1pl, px2pl: йытӑ·тӑм > йыт·тӑм"
!AE:0 <=> _ %>: %{dup%}: ;
!	except
!!		_ %>: %{dup%}: %{У%}: ;
!!		_ %>: %{dup%}: %{в%}: %{ӗ%}: ;
!! the above contexts COMBINED below:
!      _ %>: %{dup%}: [ %{У%}: | [ %{в%}: %{ӗ%}: ] ] ;
!                _ %{Ӑdel%}:/[ %>: | :0 ] ;
!	where AE in ( ӑ ӗ ) ;

!!! JNW TEMP
!"px3sp -ӗ > 0 in dative"
!ӗ:0 <=> %{dup%}: %{в%}: _ %{н%}: %{w%}: %>: %{н%}: %{А%}: ;
!	except AEVow: %{RUS%}:* %>: %{dup%}: %{в%}: _ ;		! 17.08.12 - I have uncommented this line, as it generated lots of # forms
!                   о: %{RUS%}:* %>: %{dup%}: %{в%}: _ ;		! правительстви
!!!%<px3sp%>:%>%{dup%}%{ӗ%}%{н%} POS-INFL ;
!!!%<dat%>:%{w%}%>%{н%}%{А%} COP ;

!"allative: чӗлхе>елле > чӗлхе>лле"
!%{А%}:0 <=> AEVow: %>: _ л л %{А%}: ;
!	where AE in ( а е ) ;

!FIXME: Doesn't work
!"челхе·{А}х > челхех"
!%{А%}:0 <=> Vow: %>: _ ;
!	where Vow in ( Glasnye %{А%} );

"Лишный ч исчезается после согласных"
%{ч%}:0 <=> :Soglasnye/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ;
        except :Sonornye/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ;

"Delete {ӑ} before a vowel"
%{ӑ%}:0 <=> _ %{RUS%}: %>: [ %{У%}: | %{Ӗ%}: | %{Ӑ%}: ] ;
